Tennessee statutes. Title 21 Proceedings In Chancery
Part 1

General Provisions

21-1-101. Application to all equitable proceedings.

This title applies to all equitable proceedings in any other court.

Code 1858, § 2752; Shan., § 4443; Code 1932, § 8569; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-101.

Compiler's Notes. See the Tennessee rules of civil procedure for other provisions governing chancery proceedings.

Cross-References. One form of action, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, §§ 2, 46, 55.

Comparative Legislation. Equitable proceedings.

Ark. Code § 16-13-301 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 9-5-131 et seq.

Cited: Bradford v. Stephens, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 529 (Tenn. Ct. App. Sept. 27, 2011).

21-1-102. Oaths to bills.

Bills required to be under oath may be sworn to in the state before any judge, clerk of a court, general sessions judge or notary public, whose attestation shall be deemed evidence of the fact. Bills required to be under oath may be sworn to out of the state, before a notary public, or a commissioner for this state, whose attestation shall be accompanied by the notary public's or commissioner's seal of office, or before a judge of the state, whose official character shall be attested by the clerk of the court in which the judge presides.

Code 1858, §§ 4330, 4331 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 11; 1826, ch. 19, § 1); Shan., §§ 6140, 6141; Code 1932, §§ 10411, 10412; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 109, § 16; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 329, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 345, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-106.

Cross-References. Signing of pleadings, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 11.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 110.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Affidavits, § 2.

21-1-103. Right to trial by jury.

Either party to a suit in chancery is entitled, upon application, to a jury to try and determine any material fact in dispute, save in cases involving complicated accounting, as to such accounting and those elsewhere excepted by law or by this code, and all the issues of fact in any proper cases, shall be submitted to one (1) jury.

Acts 1976, ch. 436, § 1; T.C.A., § 21-1011.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 8, 202, 216.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 1-39.01-1, 1-49.01-1.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, §§ 56, 60-65, 71; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jury, §§ 2, 6.

Law Reviews.

Equity — Right to Jury Trial in Equity Cases, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 230.

Jury Trial in Chancery Court in Tennessee, 7 Vand. L. Rev. 393.

Laches at Law in Tennessee, 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 211 (1997).

Tennessee Procedure — Right to Jury Trial in Chancery — Purely Equitable Suit, 7 Vand. L. Rev. 299.

Cited: Pan-Am Southern Corp. v. Cummins, 156 F. Supp. 673, 1957 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2844 (D. Tenn. 1957); State ex rel. Moretz v. Johnson City, 581 S.W.2d 628, 1979 Tenn. LEXIS 435 (Tenn. 1979); Anderson County Quarterly Court v. Judges of 28th Judicial Circuit, 579 S.W.2d 875, 1978 Tenn. App. LEXIS 344 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1978); Hopson v. Southern American Ins. Co., 618 S.W.2d 745, 1980 Tenn. App. LEXIS 426 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1980); Bynum v. Hollowell, 656 S.W.2d 400, 1983 Tenn. App. LEXIS 602 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1983); Trimble v. Sonitrol of Memphis, Inc., 723 S.W.2d 633, 1986 Tenn. App. LEXIS 3230 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1986); Smyrna v. Ridley, 730 S.W.2d 318, 1987 Tenn. LEXIS 905 (Tenn. 1987); Wright v. Quillen, 909 S.W.2d 804, 1995 Tenn. App. LEXIS 195 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1995); Thompson v. Young (In re Estate of Thompson), 952 S.W.2d 429, 1997 Tenn. App. LEXIS 2 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1997); Myint v. Allstate Ins. Co., 970 S.W.2d 920, 1998 Tenn. LEXIS 293 (Tenn. 1998); McInturff v. Neeseman, 986 S.W.2d 11, 1998 Tenn. App. LEXIS 648 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1998); Keisling v. Keisling, 196 S.W.3d 703, 2005 Tenn. App. LEXIS 747 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2005).

21-1-104. Appointment of referees and commissioners.

The chancellors, in vacation as well as in term, have the power to appoint referees or commissioners to take accounts, where the clerk and master is interested or is unable to attend, or in other cases where it is deemed expedient.

Code 1858, § 4414 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 4, § 12); Shan., § 6224; Code 1932, § 10493; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-1104.

Cross-References. Appointment of masters, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 53.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

Attorney General Opinions. Service of process in delinquent tax actions, OAG 84-208 (6/27/84).

21-1-105. Appointments to serve process.

The chancellors may also, in like manner, appoint persons to serve original, mesne or final process, in particular cases, under special application.

Code 1858, § 4415 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 4, § 12); Shan., § 6225; Code 1932, § 10494; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-1105.

Cross-References. Process, by whom served, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 4.01.

Law Reviews.

Quiet Title Actions in Tennessee, 15 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 263 (1985).

21-1-106. Regulation of master's proceedings.

The chancellor may also, in vacation as well as in term, but if in vacation, on reasonable notice to the opposite party, regulate and control all proceedings in the master's office, and, for good cause shown, may set aside, modify or alter any such proceedings, upon such terms as appear equitable.

Code 1858, § 4416 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 41); Shan., § 6226; Code 1932, § 10495; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-1106.

Cross-References. Masters, appointment and powers, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 53.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

21-1-107. Incompetency of chancellor on vacation matters.

In all cases in which the chancellor of the division in which any cause is pending is incompetent, the chancellor of any adjoining division has the same power, in vacation, to make all such orders and decrees, issue all such process, and dissolve, restore or modify injunctions, to appoint receivers, and do and perform any other duty that may be performed by the chancellor of the division, as provided by this part, but notice of the application shall be the same as to time and place as is prescribed for taking depositions. The party making the application shall state, by affidavit, that the chancellor is incompetent.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 6227, 6228; Code 1932, §§ 10496, 10497; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-1107.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 625.

Collateral References.

Power of successor or substituted master or referee to render decision or enter judgment on testimony heard by predecessor. 70 A.L.R.3d 1079.

21-1-108. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 21-1-108 (Acts 1929, ch. 97; C. Supp. 1950, § 10605.1; Acts 1972, ch. 565, § 1), concerning rules of practice of the chancery court, was repealed by Acts 2002, ch. 493, § 1, effective July 1, 2002.